Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1806
Director of Agriculture; reciprocal agreements; basis.

The director shall have the power and authority to enter into reciprocal agreements with the duly authorized representatives of other jurisdictions, federal or state, for the exchange of information and audit reports on a cooperative basis which may assist the director in the proper administration of sections 54-1801 to 54-1808.

Laws 1969, c. 448, § 6, p. 1501.